Oklahoma, session 2025, SB601.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:



Req. No. 213 Page 1


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1001a-1 of Title 22, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Death Penalty


Moratorium Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1001a-2 of Title 22, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The execution of the judgment in all cases where a sentence


of death has been imposed is hereby stayed until further act of the


Legislature.


B. The Court of Criminal Appeals shall not order execution of


the judgment in cases where a sentence of death has been imposed.


C. No further execution dates shall be set by the Court of


Criminal Appeals or by the Governor.


D. All execution dates currently in place at the time of the


effective date of this act shall be vacated.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1001a-3 of Title 22, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. All statutes governing the execution of the penalty of death


in this state are hereby suspended. Upon repeal of this act by the


Legislature, any such statute that has not otherwise been repealed


shall return to full force and effect.

Req. No. 213 Page 2


B. The provisions of this act shall not be construed to vacate


the individual judgments in cases where a sentence of death has been


imposed.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


A. There is hereby created until November 30, 2029, the Death


Penalty Reform Task Force to study and report on the progress of


implementing reforms to the use of the death penalty in this state.


B. The task force shall be comprised of five (5) members to be


appointed as follows:


1. One member to be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of


the Senate;


2. One member to be appointed by the Minority Leader of the


Senate;


3. One member to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of


Representatives;


4. One member to be appointed by the Minority Leader of the


House of Representatives; and


5. One member to be appointed by the Governor.


C. Appointments to the task force shall be made within sixty


(60) days after the effective date of this act.


D. The task force shall conduct an organizational meeting no


later than November 1, 2025. A chair and vice chair shall be


selected to serve by the membership of the task force at the

Req. No. 213 Page 3


organizational meeting. The task force may meet as often as may be


required to perform the duties imposed upon the task force.


E. The primary function of the task force shall be to create


reports describing in detail the degree to which the recommendations


contained in the 2017 Report of the Oklahoma Death Penalty Review


Commission have been put into effect in this state. The task force


may coordinate, communicate, and collaborate with state and federal


agencies, nonprofit organizations, public and private health care


entities, and state educational institutions regarding issues


associated with the death penalty.


F. A quorum of the task force members shall be required to


approve any final action of the task force. For purposes of this


subsection, three members of the task force shall constitute a


quorum.


G. The meetings of the task force shall be subject to the


Oklahoma Open Meeting Act.


H. Members of the task force shall receive no compensation or


travel reimbursement.


I. The Department of Corrections shall provide staff and


administrative support for the task force.


J. The task force shall electronically submit a report of its


findings no later than November 30, 2026, to the President Pro


Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives,


and the Governor, such report to be supplemented and updated on

Req. No. 213 Page 4


November 30 of each year thereafter until the termination of the


task force.


SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-213 TEK 1/19/2025 5:39:44 AM

































Req. No. 213 Page 5